src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
* **+Cmp/Hyph** compounds where first part ends in -
* **+Cmp/SgNom** compounds where first part is Sg Nom
* **+Cmp/PlNom** compounds where first part is Pl Nom
* **+Cmp/Attr** compounds where first part is Attr
* **+Cmp/SgGen** compounds where first part is Sg Gen
* **+Cmp/PlGen** compounds where first part is Pl Gen
* **+Cmp/SplitR** compounds where first part is a split compound hmm
* **+Cmp/Sh** compounds where first part is a short form
* **+Cmp** - Dynamic compound. This tag should always be part
           of a dynamic compound. It is important for
           Apertium, and useful in other cases as well.

### Others
The boundaries of compounds that are not lexicalised in the dictionary will
have compound analyses, the compounds may also have usage tags. The
compounding analyses concern also syntagmatic melting mishmash.

Compound boundary

The word and morpheme boundaries are used to limit the effective range of
far-reaching rules, such as vowel harmony. The boundaries are marked by
curly bracketed hashes or underscores. The word boundaries are marked by #,
The lexical item boundaries by ##, the inflectional morpheme boundaries
by >, the derivational morpheme boundaries by », and some etymological and
soft boundaries by _.
* `## `: Lexical boundary
* `#` word boundary
* `>` inflectional morph boundary
* `»` derivational morph boundary
* _ weak boundary

## Flag diacritics
We have manually optimised the structure of our lexicon using following
flag diacritics to restrict morhpological combinatorics - only allow compounds
with verbs if the verb is further derived into a noun again:
|  @P.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @D.NeedNoun.ON@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised
|  @C.NeedNoun@ | (Dis)allow compounds with verbs unless nominalised

|  @C.ErrOrth@
|  @D.ErrOrth.ON@
|  @P.ErrOrth.ON@

For languages that allow compounding, the following flag diacritics are needed
to control position-based compounding restrictions for nominals. Their use is
handled automatically if combined with +CmpN/xxx tags. If not used, they will
do no harm.
|  @P.CmpFrst.FALSE@ | Require that words tagged as such only appear first
|  @D.CmpPref.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering ENDLEX
|  @P.CmpPref.FALSE@ | Block these words from making further compounds
|  @D.CmpLast.TRUE@ | Block such words from entering R
|  @D.CmpNone.TRUE@ | Combines with the next tag to prohibit compounding
|  @U.CmpNone.FALSE@ | Combines with the prev tag to prohibit compounding
|  @P.CmpOnly.TRUE@ | Sets a flag to indicate that the word has passed R
|  @D.CmpOnly.FALSE@ | Disallow words coming directly from root.
Use the following flag diacritics to control downcasing of derived proper
nouns (e.g. Finnish Pariisi -> pariisilainen). See, e.g., North Sámi for how to use
these flags. There exists a ready-made regex that will do the actual down-casing
given the proper use of these flags.
|  @U.Cap.Obl@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.
|  @U.Cap.Opt@ | Allowing downcasing of derived names: deatnulasj.

| Flag diacritic | Explanation
| :------------- |:-----------
| @U.number.one@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.two@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.three@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.four@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.five@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.six@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.seven@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.eight@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.nine@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;
| @U.number.zero@ | Flag used to give arabic numerals in smj different cases ;

The start of the dictionary `Root`
The Finnish morphological description starts from any of the parts of speech
dictionaries, prefix or hyphenated suffix

* Parts-of-speech examples:*
* *talo:* `talo+N+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # house)
* *nopea:* `nopea+A+Sg+Nom` (Eng. # fast)
* *kutoa:* `kutoa+V+Act+InfA+Sg+Lat` (Eng. # to knit)
0 test NOUN

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-fin/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
